Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.011

License required.

It is a violation of RCW 18.130.190 for any person to practice chiropractic in this state unless the person has obtained a license as provided in this chapter.

[ 1987 c 150 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.